Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 5 COLORADO REVISED STATUTES
2-5-126. Annual enactment of Colorado Revised Statutes - validation - effective date.

The annual version of Colorado Revised Statutes, authorized by section 2-5-117, as corrected, collated, edited, revised, and compiled by the revisor, as printed, published, and certified by the committee on legal services and filed with the secretary of state, and as set forth with particularity in subsection (2) of this section, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado and is accepted, approved, ratified, confirmed, and validated in compliance with this article.

The annual statutes, copies of which shall be delivered to each member of the general assembly, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, constitute the official report of the committee on legal services and are hereby enacted in accordance with this section as follows:

Colorado Revised Statutes 1997. Colorado Revised Statutes 1997, including the 1997 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session and the first extraordinary session of the sixty-first general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 1997 is fixed as March 24, 1998.

Colorado Revised Statutes 1998. Colorado Revised Statutes 1998, including the 1998 special supplements, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session and the second extraordinary session of the sixty-first general assembly and at the general election on November 3, 1998. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 1998 is fixed as February 22, 1999.

Colorado Revised Statutes 1999. Colorado Revised Statutes 1999, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-second general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 1999 is fixed as February 11, 2000.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2000. Colorado Revised Statutes 2000, including the 2000 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly and at the general election on November 7, 2000. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2000 is fixed as March 21, 2001.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2001. Colorado Revised Statutes 2001, including the 2001 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session and the second extraordinary session of the sixty-third general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2001 is fixed as March 6, 2002.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2002. Colorado Revised Statutes 2002, including the 2002 special supplements, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session and the third extraordinary session of the sixty-third general assembly and at the general election on November 5, 2002. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2002 is fixed as February 14, 2003.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2003. Colorado Revised Statutes 2003, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-fourth general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2003 is fixed as March 5, 2004.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2004. Colorado Revised Statutes 2004, including the 2004 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-fourth general assembly and at the general election on November 2, 2004. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2004 is fixed as February 24, 2005.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2005. Colorado Revised Statutes 2005, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-fifth general assembly and at the odd-numbered year election on November 1, 2005. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2005 is fixed as March 7, 2006.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2006. Colorado Revised Statutes 2006, including the 2006 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session and the first extraordinary session of the sixty-fifth general assembly and at the general election on November 7, 2006. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2006 is fixed as February 21, 2007.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2007. Colorado Revised Statutes 2007, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-sixth general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2007 is fixed as March 18, 2008.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2008. Colorado Revised Statutes 2008, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-sixth general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2008 is fixed as April 21, 2009.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2009. Colorado Revised Statutes 2009, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-seventh general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2009 is fixed as February 25, 2010.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2010. Colorado Revised Statutes 2010, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-seventh general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2010 is fixed as March 2, 2011.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2011. Colorado Revised Statutes 2011, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-eighth general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2011 is fixed as March 20, 2012.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2012. Colorado Revised Statutes 2012, including the 2012 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session and the first extraordinary session of the sixty-eighth general assembly and at the general election on November 6, 2012. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2012 is fixed as February 20, 2013.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2013. Colorado Revised Statutes 2013, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-ninth general assembly and at the odd-numbered year election on November 5, 2013. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2013 is fixed as February 12, 2014.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2014. Colorado Revised Statutes 2014, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-ninth general assembly and at the general election on November 4, 2014. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2014 is fixed as the first day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday following February 25, 2015.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2015. Colorado Revised Statutes 2015, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the seventieth general assembly and at the odd-numbered year statewide election on November 3, 2015. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2015 is fixed as the first day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday following March 9, 2016.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2016. Colorado Revised Statutes 2016, including the 2016 special supplement, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the seventieth general assembly and at the general election on November 8, 2016. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2016 is fixed as March 2, 2017.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2017. Colorado Revised Statutes 2017, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the seventy-first general assembly, including the corrected replacement volume consisting of titles 42 and 43. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2017 is fixed as March 2, 2018.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2018. Colorado Revised Statutes 2018, including the special supplement 2018, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the seventy-first general assembly and at the general election on November 6, 2018. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2018 is fixed as February 21, 2019.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2019. Colorado Revised Statutes 2019, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the seventy-second general assembly and as approved by the voters at the odd-numbered year statewide election on November 5, 2019. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2019 is fixed as March 6, 2020.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2020. Colorado Revised Statutes 2020, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly, the first extraordinary session of the seventy-second general assembly, and as approved by the voters at the general election on November 3, 2020. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2020 is fixed as March 26, 2021.

Colorado Revised Statutes 2021. Colorado Revised Statutes 2021, which consists of all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature originally enacted in "Colorado Revised Statutes 1973", including subsequent enactments made pursuant to section 2-5-125, and all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the first regular session of the seventy-third general assembly. The effective date for Colorado Revised Statutes 2021 is fixed as the first day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday following March 3, 2022.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 108, § 1, effective March 23.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 8, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 2000:

(2)(c) added, p. 1, § 1, effective February 10.

L. 2001:

(2)(d) added, p. 69, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2002:

(2)(e) added, p. 5, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2003:

(2)(f) added, p. 1, § 1, effective February 13.

L. 2004:

(2)(g) added, p. 53, § 1, effective March 4.

L. 2005:

(2)(h) added, p. 22, § 1, effective February 23.

L. 2006:

(2)(i) added, p. 12, § 1, effective March 6.

L. 2007:

(2)(j) added, p. 20, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 2008:

(2)(k) added, p. 59, § 1, effective March 17.

L. 2009:

(2)(l) added, (SB 09-059), ch. 139, p. 598, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2010:

(2)(m) added, (HB 10-1039), ch. 4, p. 36, § 1, effective February 24.

L. 2011:

(2)(n) added, (HB 11-1001), ch. 3, p. 5, § 1, effective March 1.

L. 2012:

(2)(o) added, (SB 12-029), ch. 28, p. 115, § 1, effective March 19.

L. 2013:

(2)(p) added, (HB 13-1070), ch. 3, p. 7, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 2014:

(2)(q) added, (HB 14-1019), ch. 1, p. 1, § 1, effective February 11.

L. 2015:

(2)(r) added, (SB 15-035), ch. 1, p. 1, § 1, effective February 25.

L. 2016:

(2)(s) added, (SB 16-004), ch. 13, p. 30, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 2017:

(2)(t) added, (HB 17-1073), ch. 1, p. 1, § 1, effective March 1.

L. 2018:

(2)(u) added, (HB 18-1075), ch. 11, p. 162, § 1, effective March 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(v) added, (SB 19-058), ch. 6, p. 28, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 2020:

(2)(w) added, (SB 20-062), ch. 6, p. 9, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2021:

(2)(x) added, (SB 21-068), ch. 20, p. 102, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2022:

(2)(y) added, (SB 22-022), ch. 8, p. 112, § 1, effective March 3.